Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.905

Construction—2010 1st sp.s. c 15.

Nothing in chapter 15, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. may be construed to limit the authority of a public nonprofit corporation under *chapter 67.40 RCW prior to November 30, 2010.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: A majority of chapter 67.40 RCW was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 14, effective November 30, 2010. RCW 67.40.020 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 15, effective December 30, 2010.

Findings—Intent—Construction—2010 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.